Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1479
Disclosure.

A landlord may offer a tenant the opportunity to sign a written rental agreement for a mobile home space. The landlord or any person authorized to enter into a rental agreement on his or her behalf shall disclose to the tenant in writing at or before entering into the rental agreement the name and address of:

(1) The person authorized to manage the mobile home park; and

(2) The owner of the mobile home park or a person authorized to act for and on behalf of the owner for the purpose of service of process and for the purpose of receiving and receipting for notices and demands.

The information required to be furnished by this section shall be kept current and refurnished to the tenant at the tenant's request. Upon termination of a landlord's interest in a mobile home park, the provisions of this section relating to disclosure and any written rental agreements in effect at the time of the termination shall extend to and be enforceable against any successor landlord, owner, or manager.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 30.